apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="t/ene__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enendu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>engu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eni</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eni</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- pruveni -->
      <e><p><l>inemu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inite</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enenu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>enga</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enga</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enga</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>engamu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>engate</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enganu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>enerà</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eneranu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>enia</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eniamu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enianu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>inissi</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inissi</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inissi</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>enite</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enite</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>inut</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>int</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enut</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="vin/ce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cendu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cendu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- temi/accadi CORSICAN WHY U NO USE STANDARDS -->
      <e><p><l>cimu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cite</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cenu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>cia</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cianu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>cerà</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>cit</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="tem/e__vblex">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>
      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>u</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- temi/accadi CORSICAN WHY U NO USE STANDARDS -->
      <e><p><l>imu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ianu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>erà</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>it</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="scri/ve__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>vendu</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vendu</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>vu</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vi</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>vimu</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vite</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>venu</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>tt</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="tradu/ce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>cendu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cendu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>cimu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cite</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cenu</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>tt</l><r>ce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tene"><i>t</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sustene"><i>sust</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mantene"><i>mant</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ritene"><i>rit</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appartene"><i>appart</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ottene"><i>ott</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vene"><i>v</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="revene"><i>rev</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunvene"><i>cunv</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prevene"><i>prev</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pruvene"><i>pruv</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pruvene" r="LR"><p><l>prov</l><r>pruv</r></p><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beie"><i>bei</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pare"><i>par</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sinte"><i>sint</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingolle"><i>ingoll</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cupre"><i>cupr</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appuntelle"><i>appuntell</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blucche"><i>blucch</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impigne"><i>impign</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stride"><i>strid</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="racoglie"><i>racogli</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="empie"><i>empi</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="teme"><i>tem</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sprime"><i>sprim</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rende"><i>rend</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impreme"><i>imprem</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vende"><i>vend</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="accende"><i>accend</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riflette"><i>riflett</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vince"><i>vin</i><par n="vin/ce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunvince"><i>cunvinc</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="risponde"><i>rispond</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="currisponde"><i>currispond</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fughje"><i>fughj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pienghje"><i>pienghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eleghje"><i>eleghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="munghje"><i>munghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pinghje"><i>pinghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="raghjunghje"><i>raghjunghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aghjunghje"><i>aghjunghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ghjunghje"><i>ghjunghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spenghje"><i>spenghj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="distrughje"><i>distrughj</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="decide"><i>decid</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sente"><i>sent</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="corre"><i>corr</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="discorre"><i>discorr</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scrive"><i>scri</i><par n="scri/ve__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="discrive"><i>discri</i><par n="scri/ve__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inscrive"><i>inscri</i><par n="scri/ve__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vale"><i>val</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunfonde"><i>cunfond</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sorte"><i>sort</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sirve"><i>sirv</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stende"><i>stend</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pussede"><i>pussed</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esiste"><i>esist</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="entre"><i>entr</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="batte"><i>batt</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ride"><i>rid</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scopre"><i>scopr</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prutege"><i>pruteg</i><par n="tem/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="traduce"><i>tradu</i><par n="tradu/ce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riduce"><i>ridu</i><par n="tradu/ce__vblex"/></e>
